Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.710.170

Charter contracts—Performance framework.

(1) The performance provisions within a charter contract must be based on a performance framework that clearly sets forth the academic and operational performance indicators, measures, and metrics that will guide an authorizer's evaluations of a charter school within its jurisdiction.

(2) At a minimum, the performance framework must include indicators, measures, and metrics for:

(a) Student academic proficiency;

(b) Student academic growth;

(c) Achievement gaps in both proficiency and growth between major student subgroups;

(d) Attendance;

(e) Recurrent enrollment from year to year;

(f) High school graduation rates and student postsecondary readiness;

(g) Financial performance and sustainability; and

(h) Charter school board performance and stewardship, including compliance with all applicable laws, rules, and terms of the charter contract.

(3) Annual performance targets must be set by each charter school in conjunction with its authorizer and must be designed to help each school meet applicable federal, state, and authorizer expectations.

(4) The authorizer and charter school may also include additional rigorous, valid, and reliable indicators in the performance framework to augment external evaluations of the charter school's performance.

(5) The performance framework must require the disaggregation of all student performance data by major student subgroups, including gender, race and ethnicity, poverty status, special education status, English language learner status, and highly capable status.

(6) Multiple schools operating under a single charter contract or overseen by a single charter school board must report their performance as separate schools, and each school shall be held independently accountable for its performance.

[ 2016 c 241 s 117. Prior: 2013 c 2 s 217 (Initiative Measure No. 1240, approved November 6, 2012).]